Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.070

Referee's report—Contents—Evidence, filing of, frivolous.

The report of a referee appointed by the court under RCW 4.48.020 shall state the facts found, and when the order of reference includes an issue of law, it shall state the conclusions of law separately from the facts. The referee shall file with the report the evidence received upon the trial. If evidence offered by either party shall not be admitted on the trial and the party offering the same excepts to the decision rejecting such evidence at the time, the exceptions shall be noted by the referees and they shall take and receive such testimony and file it with the report. Whatever judgment the court may give upon the report, it shall, when it appears that such evidence was frivolous and inadmissible, require the party at whose instance it was taken and reported, to pay all costs and disbursements thereby incurred.

[ 1984 c 258 s 518; Code 1881 s 254; 1877 p 52 s 258; 1869 p 62 s 258; 1854 p 169 s 210; RRS s 375.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.